Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Taxation Under P.L. 92-203.

Sec. 43.98.015.
Taxation under P.L. 92-203.

The receipt of the original issue of shares of stock in a corporation organized under Alaska law pursuant to 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) by or on behalf of a Native (as defined in the federal Act) is not subject to any form of state or local taxation.

The receipt of land or an interest in it under the federal Act or of cash in order to equalize the values of property exchanged under 43 U.S.C. 1621(f) or AS 38.50 is not subject to any form of state or local taxation. The basis for computing gain or loss on subsequent sale or other disposition of this land or interest in land for purposes of a state or local tax imposed on or measured by income is the fair value of the land or interest in land at the time of receipt.

A real property interest conveyed under the federal Act, AS 38.50, or AS

38.95.050

, including land received in an exchange under § 22(f) of the federal Act or AS 38.50, to a Native individual or corporation incorporated under Alaska law pursuant to the federal Act, which interest is not developed or leased to third parties, is exempt from state and local real property taxes and local assessments until December 18, 1991. However, municipal taxes, local real property taxes, or local assessments may, under the laws of the state, be imposed upon leased or developed real property within the jurisdiction of any governmental unit organized under the laws of the state. Easements, rights-of-way, leaseholds, and similar interests in real property may be taxed in accordance with state or local law. All rents, royalties, profits, and other revenues or proceeds derived from property interests are taxable to the same extent as these revenues or proceeds are taxable when received by a non-native individual or corporation. In § 21(d) of the federal Act, the exemption of real property interests from local real property taxes includes exemption from local assessments and extends to land received in an exchange under § 22(f) of the federal Act or AS 38.50.

Use of the terms “corporate funds” and “dividends”, in § 7(j) and (m) of the federal Act, does not determine whether the money is a dividend, distribution to shareholders, funds which are property, surplus or capital of a regional corporation for the purposes of this title or AS 10.06 or other applicable state law, the provisions of § 8, ch 70, SLA 1972 notwithstanding.

History.

(§ 5 ch 70 SLA 1972; am §§ 74, 75 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 51, 52 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.80.015

. Renumbered in 2002. In 1988 “AS 10.06” was substituted for “AS 10.05” in subsection (d) to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 70, SLA 1972 (CSHB 731), see 1972 House Journal, p. 837.